Utah statutes.
63G-7-401.   Claim for injury -- Notice -- Contents -- Service -- Legal disability -- Appointment of guardian ad litem.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), a claim arises when the statute of limitations that would apply if the claim were against a private person begins to run.

(b)  The statute of limitations does not begin to run until a claimant knew, or with the exercise of reasonable diligence should have known:

(i)  that the claimant had a claim against the governmental entity or its employee; and

(ii)  the identity of the governmental entity or the name of the employee.

(c)  The burden to prove the exercise of reasonable diligence is upon the claimant.

(2)  Any person having a claim against a governmental entity, or against its employee for an act or omission occurring during the performance of the employee's duties, within the scope of employment, or under color of authority shall file a written notice of claim with the entity before maintaining an action, regardless of whether or not the function giving rise to the claim is characterized as governmental.

(3) (a)  The notice of claim shall set forth:

(i)  a brief statement of the facts;

(ii)  the nature of the claim asserted;

(iii)  the damages incurred by the claimant so far as they are known; and

(iv)  if the claim is being pursued against a governmental employee individually as provided in Subsection 63G-7-202(3)(c), the name of the employee.

(b)  The notice of claim shall be:

(i)  signed by the person making the claim or that person's agent, attorney, parent, or legal guardian; and

(ii)  directed and delivered by hand or by mail according to the requirements of Section 68-3-8.5 to the office of:

(A)  the city or town clerk, when the claim is against an incorporated city or town;

(B)  the county clerk, when the claim is against a county;

(C)  the superintendent or business administrator of the board, when the claim is against a school district or board of education;

(D)  the presiding officer or secretary/clerk of the board, when the claim is against a local district or special service district;

(E)  the attorney general, when the claim is against the state;

(F)  a member of the governing board, the executive director, or executive secretary, when the claim is against any other public board, commission, or body; or

(G)  the agent authorized by a governmental entity to receive the notice of claim by the governmental entity under Subsection (5)(e).

(4) (a)  If an injury that may reasonably be expected to result in a claim against a governmental entity is sustained by a claimant who is under the age of majority or mentally incompetent, that governmental entity may file a request with the court for the appointment of a guardian ad litem for the potential claimant.

(b)  If a guardian ad litem is appointed, the time for filing a claim under Section 63G-7-402 begins when the order appointing the guardian is issued.

(5) (a)  Each governmental entity subject to suit under this chapter shall file a statement with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code within the Department of Commerce containing:

(i)  the name and address of the governmental entity;

(ii)  the office or agent designated to receive a notice of claim; and

(iii)  the address at which it is to be directed and delivered.

(b)  Each governmental entity shall update its statement as necessary to ensure that the information is accurate.

(c)  The Division of Corporations and Commercial Code shall develop a form for governmental entities to complete that provides the information required by Subsection (5)(a).

(d) (i)  A newly incorporated municipality shall file the statement required by Subsection (5)(a) promptly after the lieutenant governor issues a certificate of incorporation under Section 67-1a-6.5.

(ii)  A newly incorporated local district shall file the statement required by Subsection (5)(a) at the time that the written notice is filed with the lieutenant governor under Section 17B-1-215.

(e)  A governmental entity may, in its statement, identify an agent authorized by the entity to accept notices of claim on its behalf.

(6)  The Division of Corporations and Commercial Code shall:

(a)  maintain an index of the statements required by this section arranged both alphabetically by entity and by county of operation; and

(b)  make the indices available to the public both electronically and via hard copy.

(7)  A governmental entity may not challenge the validity of a notice of claim on the grounds that it was not directed and delivered to the proper office or agent if the error is caused by the governmental entity's failure to file or update the statement required by Subsection (5).

